Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2210
Territorial application.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, this code applies
to (1) the affairs and estates of decedents, missing persons, and persons
to be protected, domiciled in this state, (2) the property of nonresidents
located in this state or property coming into the control of a fiduciary who
is subject to the laws of this state, (3) incapacitated persons and minors
in this state, except as provided
in the Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction
Act, and (4) survivorship and related accounts in this state.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 10, UPC § 1-301;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 122;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 30.

Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, see section 30-3901.